Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.053

Postsecondary credit for high school coursework—Master list of qualifying courses and qualifying examination scores—Dissemination of information.

(1) By December 1, 2011, and by June of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the institutions of higher education shall collaboratively develop a master list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by taking the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other recognized college-level proficiency examinations, including but not limited to examinations by a national multidisciplinary science, technology, engineering, and mathematics program, and meeting the qualifying examination score or demonstrated competencies for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary professional technical requirements. The master list of postsecondary courses fulfilled by proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies are those that fulfill lower division general education requirements or career and technical education requirements and qualify for postsecondary credit. From the master list, each institution shall create and publish a list of its courses that can be satisfied by successful proficiency examination scores or demonstrated competencies for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary professional technical requirements. The qualifying examination scores and demonstrated competencies shall be included in the published list. The requirements to develop a master list under this section do not apply if an institution has a clearly published policy of awarding credit for the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other recognized college-level placement exams and does not require those credits to meet specific course requirements but generally applies those credits towards degree requirements.

(2) To the maximum extent possible, institutions of higher education shall agree on examination qualifying scores and demonstrated competencies for the credits or courses under subsection (3) of this section, with scores equivalent to qualified or well-qualified. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent an institution of higher education from adopting policies using higher scores for additional purposes.

(3) Each institution of higher education, in designing its certificate, technical degree program, two-year academic transfer program, or first-year student and sophomore courses of a baccalaureate program or baccalaureate degree, must recognize the equivalencies of at least one year of course credit and maximize the application of the credits toward lower division general education requirements that can be earned through successfully demonstrating proficiency on examinations, including but not limited to advanced placement and international baccalaureate examinations. The successful completion of the examination and the award of credit shall be noted on the student's college transcript.

(4) Each institution of higher education must clearly include in its admissions materials and on its website the credits or the institution's list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies and the agreed-upon examination scores and demonstrated competencies that qualify for postsecondary credit. Each institution must provide the information to the student achievement council and state board for community and technical colleges in a form that the superintendent of public instruction is able to distribute to school districts.

[ 2013 c 23 s 52; 2012 c 229 s 510; 2011 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 1; 2011 c 77 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 c 77: See notes following RCW 28A.230.130.